Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.822

County sheriff to forward registration information—Felony firearm offense conviction database—Exempt from public disclosure.

(1) The county sheriff shall forward registration information, photographs, and fingerprints obtained pursuant to RCW 9.41.333 to the Washington state patrol within five working days.

(2) Upon implementation of chapter 183, Laws of 2013, the Washington state patrol shall maintain a felony firearm offense conviction database of felony firearm offenders required to register under RCW 9.41.333 and shall adopt rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of chapter 183, Laws of 2013.

(3) Upon expiration of the person's duty to register, as described in RCW 9.41.333(8), the Washington state patrol shall automatically remove the person's name and information from the database.

(4) The felony firearm offense conviction database of felony firearm offenders shall be used only for law enforcement purposes and is not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2013 c 183 s 6.]